Washington statutes.
RCW 38.24.010

Payment of military claims and expenses.

All bills, claims and demands for military purposes shall be certified or verified and audited in the manner prescribed by regulations promulgated by the governor and shall be paid by the state treasurer from funds available for that purpose. In all cases where the organized militia, or any part of the organized militia, is called into active state service to perform duties under RCW 38.08.040, except for anticipated planning, training, exercises, and other administrative duties that are not of an emergent nature, warrants for allowed pay and expenses for such services or compensation for injuries or death shall be drawn upon the general fund of the state treasury and paid out of any moneys in said fund not otherwise appropriated. All such warrants shall be the obligation of the state and shall bear interest at the legal rate from the date of their presentation for payment. Claims and expenses for organized militia in active state service under RCW 38.08.040 that are not paid under this section may be paid under RCW 38.40.220.

[ 2008 c 44 s 2; 2005 c 9 s 2; 1991 c 43 s 4; 1989 c 19 s 36; 1973 c 106 s 14; 1943 c 130 s 42; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-42. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 36; 1909 c 134 s 56, part; 1895 c 108 s 91, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 9: See note following RCW 38.08.040.